Utah statutes.
59-10-116.   Tax on nonresident individual -- Calculation -- Exemption.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a tax is imposed on a nonresident
individual in an amount equal to the product of the:
(a)  nonresident individual's state taxable income; and
(b)  percentage listed in Subsection 59-10-104(2).
(2)  This section does not apply to a nonresident individual exempt from
taxation under Section 59-10-104.1.
